California statutes. Insurance Code
  ARTICLE 10. Conversion of an Incorporated Medical Malpractice  Mutual Insurer into an Incorporated Stock Insurer [4097. - 4097.20.]

4097.

(a) A domestic incorporated medical malpractice mutual insurer, issuing nonassessable policies on a reserve basis may be converted into an incorporated stock insurer issuing, on a reserve basis, nonassessable policies either by demutualization or by establishing a mutual holding company. To that end, it may provide and carry out a plan for the conversion by complying with the requirements of this article.

(b) A mutual holding company may be converted into a stock corporation. To that end, it may provide and carry out a plan for the conversion by complying with the requirements of this article.

(c) As part of the conversion authorized in this section, a domestic incorporated medical malpractice mutual insurer may merge with an incorporated stock insurer, if the merging insurers comply with the provisions of Article 9 (commencing with Section 4090) applicable to their participation in the merger, or may transfer its domicile to any other state, if the insurer complies with Section 709.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 421, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

4097.01.

The definitions in this section apply to the following terms when used in this article.

(a) “Adoption date” means the date the board of directors adopts the plan of conversion.

(b) “Converted company” means the converted insurer or converted mutual holding company, as the case may be.

(c) “Converted insurer” means the incorporated stock insurer into which a medical malpractice mutual insurer has been converted or merged or redomiciled in accordance with the provisions of this article.

(d) “Converted mutual holding company” means the stock corporation into which a mutual holding company has been converted in accordance with this article.

(e) “Converting mutual company” means, for a plan of conversion under this article, the medical malpractice mutual insurer or mutual holding company that is converting under the plan.

(f) “Demutualization” means the conversion of a medical malpractice mutual insurer into a stock insurer without the establishment of a mutual holding company or the conversion of a mutual holding company into a stock corporation.

(g) “Effective date” means, for the conversion of a medical malpractice mutual insurer, the date upon which the conversion of the mutual insurer is effective, as specified in the commissioner’s amendment to the mutual insurer’s certificate of authority issued in accordance with Section 4097.11, as a result of conversion proceedings under this article. For the conversion of a medical malpractice mutual holding company, “effective date” means the date upon which the conversion of a mutual holding company is effective, as specified in the amended articles of incorporation of the mutual holding company filed with the Secretary of State in accordance with Section 4097.11, as a result of conversion proceedings under this article.

(h) “Eligible members” means, for the conversion of a mutual insurer, members of the mutual insurer who are of record, fully paid-up and otherwise in good standing on the mutual insurer’s adoption date and on its effective date, but shall not include those persons covered solely under a reporting endorsement to a claims made policy on either date. For the conversion of a mutual holding company, “eligible members” means the members of the mutual holding company who are of record, fully paid-up with respect to policies in effect issued by the converted insurer and are otherwise in good standing on the mutual holding company’s adoption date and on its effective date.

(i) “Medical malpractice mutual insurer” means a mutual insurer organized under this chapter that writes predominantly medical malpractice insurance, as that class of insurance is defined in subdivision (d) of Section 108. A mutual insurer shall be considered to write predominantly medical malpractice insurance if, for each of the most recent five calender years, its direct written premiums for medical malpractice insurance, as reported in the annual statement filed with the commissioner pursuant to Section 900, is not less than 50 percent of its aggregate direct premiums for all classes of insurance.

(j) “Member” means a person who, by the records of the mutual company and by its articles of incorporation or bylaws, is deemed to be a holder of a membership interest in the mutual company. On and after the effective date of a plan of conversion that creates a mutual holding company, the term “member” means a member of a mutual holding company, as provided in Section 4097.12.

(k) “Membership interests” means the interests of members arising under this code and the articles of incorporation and bylaws of the mutual company or otherwise by law. Membership interests include the right to vote for directors of the mutual company and the right to vote on any plan of merger, consolidation, reinsurance, or transfer of assets and liabilities of the mutual company.

(l) “Mutual company” means, in the case of a plan of conversion, the medical malpractice mutual insurer or mutual holding company that is converting pursuant to the plan.

(m) “Mutual holding company” means a corporation organized under the laws of this state subject to the general corporation law as set forth in the Corporations Code. The articles of incorporation of a mutual holding company shall contain provisions stating the following:

(1) It is a mutual holding company organized under this article.

(2) One purpose of the mutual holding company is to hold not less than 51 percent of the voting stock of a stock holding company, which in turn holds all of the voting stock of a converted insurer. In addition, the mutual holding company shall own not less than 51 percent of the total stockholders’ equity of the stock holding company at all times.

(3) It is not authorized to issue voting stock.

(4) Its members have the rights specified in Section 4097.12 and in its articles of incorporation and bylaws.

(5) Its assets and liabilities are subject to inclusion in the estate of the converted insurer in any proceedings successfully prosecuted against the converted insurer under Article 14 (commencing with Section 1010) or Article 14.3 (commencing with Section 1064.1) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 1.

(n) “Mutual holding company independent director” means a member of the board of directors of the mutual holding company who does not own shares, options, or any other equity interests in the stock holding company.

(o) “Mutual insurer” means, in the case of a plan of conversion under this article, the medical malpractice mutual insurer that is converting pursuant to the plan.

(p) “Person” means an individual, partnership, firm, association, corporation, joint-stock company, limited liability company, trust, government or governmental agency, state or political subdivision of a state, public or private corporation, board, association, estate, trustee, or fiduciary, or any similar entity.

(q) “Plan of conversion” or “plan” means a plan adopted by a mutual company in compliance with this article.

(r) “Policy” means an individual or group policy of insurance issued by a mutual insurer or a converted insurer. If a policy takes a form other than an individual form but holders of certificates or other interests under the policy are treated by the mutual insurer as if they were holders of individual policies, the mutual insurer may provide in its plan of conversion under this article that such a certificate or other interest is deemed to be a policy and deem the holder of the certificate or other interest to be an owner of a policy. Such a provision shall be for the sole purpose of determining the rights, if any, of policyholders of the mutual insurer to vote upon and receive consideration under the plan of conversion and shall not affect the other voting rights and qualifications of members of the mutual insurer.

(s) “Policyholder” means the holder of a policy other than a reinsurance contract.

(t) “Rights in surplus,” for a mutual insurer, means rights of members of the insurer to a return of that portion of the surplus that has not been apportioned or declared by the board of directors for policyholder dividends. “Rights in surplus” includes rights of members of the insurer to a distribution of surplus in liquidation, conservation or demutualization of the insurer under this code, or in a dissolution or winding up. “Rights in surplus,” for a mutual holding company, means rights of members of the company to a return of any surplus that has not been apportioned or declared by its board of directors for member dividends. “Rights in surplus” includes rights of members of the mutual holding company to a distribution of surplus in liquidation, conservation, or demutualization of the insurer under this code, or in a dissolution or winding up. “Rights in surplus” does not include any right expressly conferred solely by the terms of an insurance policy.

(u) “Stock holding company” means a corporation authorized to issue one or more classes of capital stock, the corporate purposes of which include holding all of the voting stock in an insurer that has been converted from a mutual insurer to a stock insurer in proceedings under Section 4097.05 in which a mutual holding company is formed.

(v) “Voting stock” means securities of any class or any ownership interest having voting power for the election of directors, trustees, or management of a person, other than securities having voting power only because of the occurrence of a contingency. All references to a specified percentage of voting stock of any person mean securities having the specified percentage of the voting power in that person for the election of directors, trustees, or management of that person, other than securities having voting power only because of the occurrence of a contingency.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 421, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

4097.02.

The plan of conversion shall include appropriate proceedings for amending the mutual company’s articles of incorporation to give effect to the conversion from a nonstock corporation into a stock corporation. The plan shall be:

(a) Approved by a resolution of two-thirds of the board of directors. The resolution shall specify the reasons for and the purposes of the proposed conversion of the mutual company and the manner in which the conversion is expected to benefit and serve the best interests of the policyholders, for a mutual insurer, or members, for a mutual holding company.

(b) Submitted to the commissioner for consent in writing, subject to the provisions of Section 4097.06, by an application executed by an authorized officer of the mutual company and accompanied by the following documents, or true and correct copies of the documents:

(1) The proposed plan of conversion.

(2) The proposed articles of incorporation of each corporation that is a constituent corporation of the conversion.

(3) The proposed bylaws of each corporation that is a constituent corporation of the conversion.

(4) A list of officers and directors, together with their biographies in the form customarily required by the commissioner, of each corporation that is a constituent corporation of the conversion.

(5) The resolution of the board of directors of the mutual company, certified by the secretary of the board of directors, authorizing the conversion under this article, and a report of the percentage of directors approving the resolution.

(6) Financial statements, which may be prepared on a pro forma basis, in the form required by the commissioner.

(7) For a conversion of a mutual insurer, a plan of operations for the converted insurer.

(8) A summary of the plan of conversion and drafts of written materials to be mailed to members seeking their approval of the plan.

(9) If the plan provides for the establishment of a mutual holding company under Section 4097.05, it shall contain all of the following:

(A) An information statement containing, at a minimum, the information required under Section 4097.07.

(B) A description of any plans for an initial public offering, including a description of the maximum percentage of stock to be sold, the process to be used in offering the stock and setting the initial sale price for the stock, and how policyholders would be treated in an initial public offering.

(C) A description of any plans for the transfer of assets and liabilities, including any subsidiaries, to the mutual holding company.

(D) Any final rulings relating to the plan of reorganization obtained from any federal government agency, and all supporting documents submitted to the agency in connection with those rulings.

(10) A copy of the proposed form of notice of the special meeting sent to members pursuant to Section 4097.07.

(11) Other relevant information that the commissioner may require.

(c) Approved by two-thirds of the members of the mutual company voting at a meeting of the members called for that purpose, subject to the provisions of Section 4097.07.

(d) Filed in the office of the commissioner after receipt of the commissioner’s consent, and after having been approved as provided in Sections 4097.06 and 4097.07, respectively.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 421, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

4097.03.

For the conversion of a medical malpractice mutual insurer, the plan of conversion shall provide for either a demutualization in compliance with Section 4097.04 or for a mutual holding company in compliance with Section 4097.05. For the conversion of a mutual holding company, the plan of conversion shall provide for demutualization in compliance with Section 4097.04.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 421, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

4097.04.

For the demutualization of a mutual insurer into a stock insurer or for the demutualization of a mutual holding company into a stock corporation, the plan for conversion shall include the following:

(a) A fair, just, and equitable formula, approved by the commissioner, for determining the rights in surplus of each eligible member in the mutual company. The formula shall take account of both the total premiums paid by each eligible member and the duration of his or her membership. The rights in surplus shall be based upon an appraisal of the fair value of the mutual company by one or more qualified disinterested persons appointed by the mutual company with the approval of the commissioner. Those persons shall consider the assets and liabilities of the mutual company and any factors bearing on the value of the mutual company.

(b) Each eligible member of the mutual company shall be given a preemptive right to acquire his or her proportionate part of all of the proposed capital stock of the converting mutual company, within a designated reasonable period, by applying upon the purchase of that part the amount of his or her rights in surplus as determined under the formula described in subdivision (a).

(c) Each member not applying his or her rights in surplus upon the purchase price of stock shall elect to receive either a cash payment or a certificate of contribution. The cash payment shall not be greater than 50 percent of his or her rights in surplus as determined by the formula in subdivision (a). The certificate of contribution shall be in an amount equal to 100 percent of his or her rights in surplus, as determined by the formula in subdivision (a), shall bear interest at the rate established in Section 10489.4 for minimum standard valuation of all life insurance policies of more than 20 years’ duration issued in the year, and shall be repayable within 10 years or, if necessary under the terms of the plan, later, only on written approval of the commissioner and only out of surplus in excess of an amount established in the plan. Any member not electing to receive cash or purchase stock shall be deemed to have elected to receive a certificate of contribution. The stock purchased, cash payment, or certificate of contribution shall constitute full payment and discharge of the member’s rights in surplus or property interest in the mutual company, and, notwithstanding any other provision of law, the member shall have no other rights with respect thereto.

(d) The number of shares to be authorized for the new stock insurer, their par value, and the method for determining the price at which the shares will be offered to eligible members, to the end that the plan, when completed, would satisfy the financial requirements for issuance of a license to transact insurance.

(e) Provision for the offering to others of shares not purchased by eligible members within the designated period referred to in subdivision (b) at a price not less than the offering price to members.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 421, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

4097.05.

A plan of conversion adopted by a medical malpractice mutual insurer to establish a mutual holding company shall provide that the medical malpractice mutual insurer will become a stock insurer, that the members of the medical malpractice mutual insurer will become members of a mutual holding company, that the mutual holding company will acquire at least 51 percent of the voting stock of the stock holding company, and that the stock holding company will acquire all of the voting stock of the converted insurer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 421, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

4097.06.

(a) The commissioner shall examine the plan submitted pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 4097.02. If the plan provides for the establishment of a mutual holding company under Section 4097.05, the mutual insurer shall demonstrate that the issuance of stock:

(1) Will not require members to pay additional funds to retain their rights in surplus, but nothing herein is intended to prohibit or restrict a mutual insurer that is converting to a stock insurer by establishing a mutual holding company from offering to its members subscription rights that are in addition to the rights in surplus to be held in the mutual holding company.

(2) Issued to officers, directors, employees, or employee benefit plans for their benefit, if any, will be fair, just and equitable and not hazardous to policyholders, stockholders, or creditors.

(3) Provides sufficient means for the accumulated earnings, cash, and other non-operating assets held by the mutual holding company to inure to the exclusive benefit of its members.

(b) As part of the examination the commissioner shall order a public hearing on the plan after written notice of the hearing to the mutual company, its members, and the public. Members of the mutual company, their representatives, and the public shall have the right to appear at the public hearing and to submit written comments to the commissioner. The hearing shall occur before the policyholder vote. The commissioner may require as a condition of consent that the mutual company make modifications of the proposed plan that the commissioner finds necessary for the protection of policyholders. The commissioner shall consent to the plan if he or she finds all of the following:

(1) For the conversion of a mutual insurer, the plan is fair, just, and equitable to the insurer and its policyholders.

(2) For the conversion of a mutual holding company, the plan is fair, just, and equitable to the company, its members, and the policyholders of the converted insurer.

(3) The plan does not violate the law.

(4) The converted insurer will, after the conversion, satisfy the requirements for the issuance of a license to write the line or lines of insurance for which it is presently licensed.

(c) For the conversion of a mutual company, the commissioner may appoint one or more actuarial, financial, or other consultants, including legal counsel, as the commissioner finds necessary to advise the commissioner in making the determination of whether the proposed plan of conversion meets the applicable requirements of this article. The mutual company is responsible for the reasonable fees and expenses of any actuarial, financial, or other consultants, including legal counsel, appointed, and for the mailing and publication of notices to the mutual company and its members.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 421, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

4097.07.

The meeting of members prescribed by subdivision (c) of Section 4097.02 shall be called by the board of directors, the chairperson of the board, or the president of the mutual company. Notice of the meeting shall be given to eligible members by mail at least 45 days prior to the date set for the meeting to members of the mutual company of record on the date the plan of conversion was adopted by the board of directors. In the event that a plan of reorganization provides for the establishment of a mutual holding company under Section 4097.05, the notice shall be accompanied by an information statement describing the proposed reorganization. The information statement shall include, at a minimum, the following items:

(a) A full copy and a summary of the plan of reorganization.

(b) A discussion addressing the reasons and purposes of the proposed restructuring, which shall include a comparison to a demutualization.

(c) An analysis of the benefits and risks associated with the proposed reorganization to the mutual company and its policyholders.

(d) An explanation of how the restructuring will benefit policyholders, as well as a description of any potential risks to policyholder interests and a description of how the policyholders’ rights differ at the mutual holding company level from those in the existing company.

(e) A description of any stock issuance, including any shares or options to be issued to directors, officers, agents, employees, or employee benefit plans, for their benefit, that will be made in conjunction with the plan of conversion, if any, and the guidelines and parameters which shall apply in the event stock is to be issued, including a detailed discussion of subscription rights that are to be granted to policyholders.

(f) Any proposed amendments to the mutual insurer’s articles of incorporation to address the restructuring from a mutual to a stock insurer.

(g) Any proposed articles and bylaws of the mutual holding company and any other entities to be created in the reorganization.

(h) Financial information.

(i) Any other information that the commissioner determines is necessary to make a complete and adequate disclosure to policyholders.

Voting shall be by ballot, in person or by proxy. A quorum shall consist of 10 percent of the members of the mutual company entitled to vote at the meeting.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 421, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

4097.08.

Nothing in this article shall be deemed to prohibit the inclusion in the plan of conversion of provisions under which the insurer’s officers, directors, employees, agents, and employee benefit plans for their benefit may be entitled, in accordance with reasonable classifications of those individuals and employee benefit plans as may be included in the plan, to purchase for cash, at the same price as offered to the public in the initial public offering, voting stock not purchased by members upon exercise of subscription rights. Nothing in this code shall be deemed to prohibit the establishment of stock option, incentive, and share ownership plans customary for publicly traded companies in the same and similar industries. The plan may not permit those persons to acquire any of the following:

(a) Greater than 25 percent of the voting stock issued pursuant to the plan for a medical malpractice mutual insurer having assets in excess of two hundred million dollars ($200,000,000) or 35 percent for a medical malpractice mutual insurer having assets of two hundred million dollars ($200,000,000) or less.

(b) Greater than 25 percent of the stockholders’ equity for a medical malpractice mutual insurer having assets in excess of two hundred million dollars ($200,000,000) or 35 percent for a medical malpractice mutual insurer having assets of less than two hundred million dollars ($200,000,000).

(c) Unexercised options that exceed 20 percent of the number of the issued and outstanding shares.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 421, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

4097.09.

No director, officer, agent, or employee of the mutual company shall receive any fee, commission, or other valuable consideration whatsoever, other than regular salary and compensation, for in any manner aiding, promoting, or assisting in the conversion except as set forth in the plan approved by the commissioner. This provision shall not be deemed to prohibit the payment of reasonable fees and compensation to attorneys at law, accountants, and actuaries for services performed in the independent practice of their professions, even though they may also be directors of the mutual company.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 421, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

4097.10.

At any time before that plan of conversion becomes effective as provided in Section 4097.11, the mutual company may, by resolution of at least two-thirds of the board of directors, amend the plan of conversion or withdraw the plan of conversion. Any plan amendment shall require the written consent of the commissioner. For a plan amendment, all references in this article to the plan of conversion shall be deemed to refer to the plan as amended, but no amendment shall be deemed to change the adoption date of the plan of conversion. No amendment may change the plan of conversion in a manner that the commissioner determines is materially disadvantageous to policyholders of the mutual insurer or members of the mutual holding company, unless a further public hearing is held on the plan as amended, if the amendment is made after the initial public hearing, or if the plan as amended is submitted for reconsideration by the members if the amendment is made after the plan has been approved by the members.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 421, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

4097.11.

(a) Upon consent by the commissioner to the plan of conversion of a mutual insurer and filing of the plan of conversion in accordance with the provisions of this article, the commissioner shall issue a new certificate of authority to the converted insurer. Upon issuance of the certificate of authority to a mutual insurer and subject to subdivision (a) of Section 110 of the Corporations Code, the Secretary of State shall accept for filing the articles of incorporation, certificate of amendment of articles of incorporation, or agreement of merger and officers’ certificates of the converted insurer for the conversion of a mutual insurer. For a plan of conversion that provides for the establishment of a mutual holding company in accordance with Section 4097.05, the Secretary of State shall accept for filing the articles of incorporation of the mutual holding company and the stock holding company. Upon consent to the plan of conversion of a mutual holding company and filing of the plan of conversion in accordance with the provisions of this article, the Secretary of State shall accept for filing the articles of incorporation or certificate of amendment of articles of incorporation of the converted mutual holding company. The plan is effective upon the filing of the articles of incorporation or certificate of amendment of articles of incorporation.

(b) Upon the effective date of the plan of conversion of a mutual insurer, the mutual insurer shall immediately become a stock corporation. The converted insurer shall be a continuation of the original mutual insurer, and the conversion shall in no way annul, modify, or change any of the original mutual insurer’s existing suits, rights, contracts, or liabilities except as provided in the approved conversion plan. The insurer, after conversion, shall exercise all the rights and powers and perform all the duties conferred or imposed by law upon insurers writing the classes of insurance written by it, and shall retain the rights and contracts existing prior to conversion, subject to the effect of the plan.

(c) Upon the effective date of the plan of conversion of a mutual holding company, all membership interests and rights in surplus are extinguished, members eligible to receive consideration under the plan of conversion are entitled to receive the consideration in exchange for their membership interests and liquidation of their rights in surplus, and the plan otherwise becomes effective in accordance with its terms. The conversion in no way annuls, modifies, or changes any of the converting mutual holding company’s existing suits, rights, contracts, or liabilities, except as provided in the approved plan of conversion.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 421, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

4097.12.

(a) Upon the effective date of a plan of conversion in accordance with Section 4097.05, the mutual insurer immediately becomes a stock corporation, the membership interests and rights in surplus of its members are extinguished, the members of the mutual insurer immediately become members of the mutual holding company and are granted rights in surplus in the mutual holding company equivalent to those rights in surplus previously held in the converted company, all of the voting stock initially issued by the converted insurer is owned by the stock holding company, and all of the voting stock initially issued by the stock holding company is owned by the mutual holding company. Except for the membership interests in the mutual insurer, which become membership interests in the mutual holding company, nothing herein is intended to, nor shall eliminate, curtail or otherwise diminish the contract rights of policyholders of a converted company. The stock holding company may thereafter, subject to compliance with Article 8 (commencing with Section 820) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 1, issue securities to other persons. After the effective date, owners of policies that are issued by a stock insurer that has been converted from a mutual insurer pursuant to proceedings under this article shall become members of the mutual holding company immediately upon issuance of the policies, except that owners of a reporting endorsements issued by the insurer that provide strictly tail coverage on expired claims made policies shall not be members of the mutual holding company. Any person may be a member of a mutual holding company.

(b) From the effective date, the mutual holding company shall hold at least 51 percent of the issued and outstanding voting stock of the stock holding company and the stock holding company thereafter shall at all times hold all of the issued and outstanding voting stock of the converted insurer. The stock holding company may issue additional voting stock, and securities convertible into voting stock, to the mutual holding company and to other persons if, in the aggregate, the voting stock of the stock holding company held by the mutual holding company is not less than 51 percent of the issued and outstanding voting stock of the stock holding company. For purposes of the 51 percent limitation, any issued and outstanding securities of the stock holding company that are convertible into voting stock are considered issued and outstanding voting stock.

(c) From the effective date, the mutual holding company’s equity interest in the stock holding company shall not be less than 51 percent of the total stockholders’ equity in the stock holding company. For purposes of the 51 percent limitation, any issued and outstanding securities of the stock holding company that are convertible into equity securities, whether voting or nonvoting, shall be considered stockholders’ equity. Debt securities that include a default contingency conversion interest shall not be considered stockholders’ equity for compliance with the foregoing limitation.

(d) The commissioner shall retain jurisdiction over the mutual holding company pursuant to this article. For purposes of Section 1215.5, the mutual holding company shall be considered as if it were an insurance company. The commissioner shall also retain jurisdiction over the issuance of debt securities by the mutual holding company in accordance with the protections provided in Article 8 (commencing with Section 820) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 1.

(e) If any proceedings under Article 14 (commencing with Section 1010), Article 14.3 (commencing with Section 1064.1), Article 14.5 (commencing with Section 1065.1), or Article 15.5 (commencing with Section 1077), of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 1, are brought naming as a party a stock insurer created as a result of proceedings authorized by this article, the mutual holding company formed as part of the conversion automatically becomes a party to the proceedings. All of the assets of the mutual holding company, including, but not limited to, its interest in the stock holding company formed pursuant to this article, are deemed assets of the estate of the stock insurer to the extent necessary to satisfy claims of persons against the stock insurer who have claims falling within the priorities established in paragraphs (1) to (5), inclusive, of subdivision (a) of Section 1033. Claims of persons in their capacity as members of the mutual holding company shall be claims falling within the priority established in paragraph (6) of subdivision (a) of Section 1033. A mutual holding company may not dissolve, liquidate, or wind up and dissolve without the prior written approval of the commissioner or the court pursuant to proceedings brought pursuant to Article 15 (commencing with Section 1070) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 1.

(f) Except as provided in this code, a mutual holding company is subject to the provisions of the general corporation law in like manner with other corporations. However, provisions of that law referring to shareholders or members shall be applied as though those provisions referred to the members of a mutual holding company. With respect to the management, records, and affairs of a mutual holding company and except as otherwise provided in this chapter, a member of a mutual holding company has the same character of rights and relationship as a stockholder has toward a domestic stock insurer subject to the provisions of this code.

(g) Each member of a mutual holding company is entitled to one vote on each matter coming to a vote at any meeting of members, regardless of the number of policies that the member holds.

(h) Notice of all meetings of members of the mutual holding company, whether annual or special, shall be given in writing to the members entitled to vote. The notice shall be given by the secretary, assistant secretary, or other persons charged with that duty. If there is no officer so charged, or if he or she neglects or refuses this duty, notice may be given by any director. At the option of the converted insurer, the notice may be imprinted on premium notices or receipts or on both. A notice may be given to any member either personally, or by mail, or other means of written communication, charges prepaid, addressed to the member at his or her address appearing on the books of the insurer, or given by the member to the converted insurer for the purpose of notice. If a member gives no address, and if there is no address on the books of the insurer, notice shall be deemed to have been given the member if sent by mail or other means of written communication addressed to the place where the principal office of the converted insurer is situated, or if published at least once in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the office is located and in the newspaper that has the largest daily circulation in this state. Notice of any meeting of members shall be sent to each member entitled to notice not less than 14 days before a meeting. Notice of any meeting of members shall specify the place, the day, and the hour of the meeting and the general nature of the business to be transacted. For any member who gives no address and has no address on the books of the insurer, notice of an annual meeting to be held at the time and place specified is deemed adequate if published at least once in each of four successive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the principal office of the converted insurer is located and in the newspaper that has the largest daily circulation in this state. If the notice is so published, no other notice of the meeting is required.

(i) The presence in person or by proxy of 5 percent of the members of a mutual holding company entitled to vote at any meeting constitutes a quorum for the transaction of all business of the mutual holding company, including, but not limited to, the amendment of the articles of incorporation or bylaws of the mutual holding company.

(j) Any required member approval shall be by the affirmative vote of a majority of the members who vote, or a higher percentage of the members as may be required by law or the articles of incorporation, a quorum being present.

(k) The board of the mutual holding company shall be comprised of not less than 6 nor more than 18 directors. A majority of the mutual holding company directors shall be policyholders of the converted insurer. Unless the plan provides that at least a majority of the directors of the boards of the stock holding company and the converted insurer are also directors of the mutual holding company, the commissioner shall determine whether the proposed composition of the boards of directors of each of the constituent corporations of the mutual holding company system, as provided in the articles of incorporation and bylaws, facilitate the control of the converted insurer by the mutual holding company. No term shall continue longer than six years. In the absence of such provisions, each director shall be elected for a term of one year. All directors shall hold office for the term for which they are elected and until their successors are elected and qualified. The bylaws of the mutual holding company shall set forth a procedure for establishing mutual holding company independent directors in the event that the stock holding company issues securities. Not less than one of every six directors of the mutual holding company shall be so designated. A director may, but need not, be a member of the mutual holding company of which he or she is acting as director. Vacancies in the board of directors may be filled by a majority of the remaining directors, though less than a quorum. Each director so elected shall hold office until the next annual meeting.
